Hawaii statutes.
§134-16 Restriction on possession, sale,
gift, or delivery of electric guns. (a) It shall be unlawful for any
person, including a licensed manufacturer, licensed importer, or licensed
dealer, to possess, offer for sale, hold for sale, sell, give, lend, or deliver
any electric gun.

(b) Any electric gun possessed, offered for
sale, held for sale, sold, given, lent, or delivered in violation of subsection
(a) shall be confiscated and disposed of by the chief of police.

(c) This section shall not apply to:

(1) Law enforcement officers of county police
departments;

(2) Law enforcement officers of the department of
public safety;

(3) Conservation and resources enforcement officers
of the department of land and natural resources;

(4) Members of the Army or Air National Guard when
assisting civil authorities in disaster relief, emergency management, or law
enforcement functions, subject to the requirements of section 121-34.5; and

(5) Vendors providing electric guns to the
individuals described in paragraphs (1) through (4);

provided that electric guns shall at all times
remain in the custody and control of the law enforcement officers of the county
police departments, the law enforcement officers of the department of public
safety, the conservation and resources enforcement officers of the department
of land and natural resources, or the members of the Army or Air National
Guard.

(d) The county police departments of this
State, the department of public safety, the department of land and natural
resources, and the army and air national guard shall maintain records regarding
every electric gun in their custody and control. The records shall report
every instance of usage of the electric guns; in particular, records shall be
maintained in a similar manner as for those of discharging of firearms. The
county police departments, the department of public safety, the department of
land and natural resources, and the army and air national guard shall annually
report to the legislature regarding these records no later than twenty days
before the beginning of each regular session of the legislature.

(e) The department
of land and natural resources and the department of public safety shall ensure
that each of its conservation and resources enforcement officers and law
enforcement officers who is authorized to use an electric gun and related
equipment shall first receive training from the manufacturer or from a
manufacturer-approved training program, as well as by manufacturer-certified or
approved instructors in the use of electric guns prior to deployment of the
electric guns and related equipment in public. Training for conservation and
resources enforcement officers of the department of land and natural resources
and law enforcement officers of the department of public safety may be done
concurrently to ensure cost savings.

(f) No later
than June 30, 2018, the conservation and resources enforcement program of the
department of land and natural resources shall meet the law enforcement
accreditation or recognition standards of the Commission on Accreditation for
Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc., in the use of electric guns. [L 1988, c 275, pt
of §2; am L 2001, c 252, §3; am L 2002, c 16, §5; am L 2010, c 131, §1; am L
2011, c 144, §3; am L 2012, c 148, §1; am L 2014, c 111, §28]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next